Vermont, session 2025-2026, H78.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 2680 is amended to read:
§ 2680. AUSTRALIAN BALLOT SYSTEM; GENERAL
* * *
(b) Officers. Once a municipality votes to elect any or all officers by the
Australian ballot system, such the officers shall be elected in that manner until
the municipality votes to discontinue use of the system. A vote on whether to
use the Australian ballot system to elect officers shall be in substantially the
following form:
(1) “Shall (name of municipality) elect its (specify the municipal officer
or officers to be elected) by Australian ballot?” or
(2) “Shall (name of municipality) elect all municipal officers by
Australian ballot?”
* * *
Sec. 2. VALIDITY OF MUNICIPAL ELECTIONS USING THE
AUSTRALIAN BALLOT SYSTEM
(a) This act shall not render invalid the election of any municipal officer at
a 2025 annual municipal meeting. The failure of a municipality to comply
with the procedures required by this act or the prior provisions of 17 V.S.A.
VT LEG #381024 v.1

No. 1 Page 2 of 2
2025
§ 2680(b) shall not be the basis for any action related to the election of a
municipal officer at a municipality’s annual meeting in 2025.
(b) The validity of a vote by a municipality to elect some, but not all,
municipal officers prior to the effective date of this act shall not be subject to
challenge for failure to comply with this act or the prior provisions of
17 V.S.A. § 2680(b). In any municipality that voted to elect some, but not all,
municipal officers prior to the effective date of this act, the election of a
municipal officer shall not be subject to challenge for failure to comply with
this act or the prior provisions of 17 V.S.A. § 2680(b).
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: February 13, 2025
VT LEG #381024 v.1